Massachusetts, session 194th, H1918.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 52 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 18, the word “fourteen” and inserting
in place thereof the following word:- sixteen.
SECTION 2. Said section 52 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 21, the words “(a) has previously been committed to the
department of youth services, or (b) has committed an offense which involves the infliction or
threat of serious bodily harm in violation of law, or (c)” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- (a) has committed an offense which involves the infliction or threat of serious
bodily harm in violation of law, or (b).
SECTION 3. Said section 52 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 25 - 28, the words “; provided that, nothing in this clause shall
of 2

allow for less than the imposition of the mandatory commitment periods provided in section
fifty-eight of chapter one hundred and nineteen”.
SECTION 4. Section 54 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 21, the word “fourteen” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
sixteen.
SECTION 5. Section 54 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 23, the words “, and the person has previously been committed to the
department of youth services,”.
SECTION 6. Upon enactment, provisions of this bill shall apply to juvenile cases that
have not been adjudicated at the effective date of the law.
of 2